District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-218.34

Qualified metropolitan area business enterprises.

Repealed.

Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 2334, 52 DCR 7503
Mar. 2, 2007, D.C. Law 16-192, § 2132(d), 53 DCR 6899
For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2334 of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 2132(d) of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-477, August 8, 2006, 53 DCR 7068).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 2132(d) of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2006 (D.C. Act 16-499, October 23, 2006, 53 DCR 8845).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 2132(d) of Fiscal Year 2007 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2007 (D.C. Act 17-1, January 16, 2007, 54 DCR 1165).